New York, session 2025-2026, A587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 1613 of the tax law, as amended by 2 chapter 426 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 3 a. It shall be the duty of the director to require that all prizes 4 over five thousand dollars in any game be awarded to holders of winning 5 tickets for that game as provided in this section and section sixteen 6 hundred fourteen of this article. Within one week after any drawing or 7 selection of prize winning lottery tickets, the division shall deliver 8 to the comptroller a certified list of the tickets to which prizes are 9 awarded and the amount of each such prize. Upon receipt of such certi- 10 fied list and voucher of the division, moneys sufficient for the payment 11 of such prizes shall be paid to the division from the lottery prize 12 account, upon audit and warrant of the comptroller. Moneys for the 13 payment of lottery prizes shall be deposited by the director as provided 14 in section sixteen hundred eleven of this article and the withdrawal of 15 such moneys for the payment of prize winners shall be subject to a check 16 signed by the director or such officers or employees of the division as 17 the director may designate. The division shall each month provide the 18 comptroller with a record of all such withdrawals from the director's 19 accounts. Payment of prizes shall be made by the division to holders of 20 the tickets to which prizes are awarded, except that payment of any 21 prize drawn may be paid to the estate of a deceased prize winner, may be 22 paid pursuant to a court order granted as a result of a proceeding as 23 provided in subdivision d of this section, and except that any person 24 pursuant to an appropriate judicial order may be paid the prize to which EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00425-01-5 A. 587 2 1 the winner is entitled. The division shall not publicly disclose the 2 name, address or other identifying information of any holder of a 3 winning ticket or require any winning ticket holder to perform any 4 public actions in connection with the awarding, payment or collection of 5 prize moneys where a holder of a winning ticket provides a written 6 request to the division. The division shall be discharged of all further 7 liability upon payment of a prize pursuant to this subdivision. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.